Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.106

Initial and annual reports.

Each domestic limited liability company, and each foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state, must deliver to the secretary of state for filing initial and annual reports in accordance with RCW 23.95.255.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7112; 2015 c 188 s 24.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.